Utah statutes.
53A-16-108.   Levy of tax -- Collection and deposit.
(1)  After the valuation of property has been extended on the assessment
rolls, the county legislative body shall levy a tax on the taxable property in
the respective school districts at the rate submitted by each local school
board under Section 53A-16-106.
(2)  These taxes shall be collected by the county officers in the same manner
as other taxes are collected.
(3)  The county treasurer shall pay the tax revenues to the respective
district's business administrator who shall hold the tax revenue subject to
the order of the local school board.
